Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-437
Statement of dissociation.

(1) A dissociated partner or the partnership may file a statement of dissociation stating the name of the partnership and that the partner is dissociated from the partnership.

(2) A statement of dissociation is a limitation on the authority of a dissociated partner for the purposes of subsections (4) and (5) of section 67-415.

(3) For the purposes of subdivision (1)(c) of section 67-435 and subdivision (2)(c) of section 67-436, a person not a partner is deemed to have notice of the dissociation ninety days after the statement of dissociation is filed.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 37.